Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$3,320,690 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Board of
Licensed Professional Counselors and Therapists.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,877,317 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Board of
Psychology.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5523 (SB 5523-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 9, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 15, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5523 (SB 5523-A) Page 2